Maryland, session 2025, HB0889.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0889*

HOUSE BILL 889
Article – Natural Resources
4–746.
(A) (1) The Department shall conduct annually a scientific survey to determine
the relative abundance of striped bass or rockfish of approximately 18 inches in length that
are in the Chesapeake Bay and its tributaries.
(2) The survey shall be conducted in areas that are used by the Department
to determine its young–of–the–year index of striped bass or rockfish.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
4–746.
(A) IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 4–215 OF THIS TITLE, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
CONDUCT SCIENTIFIC MONITORING TO COLLECT BIOLOGICAL INFORMATION TO
DETERMINE THE RELATIVE ABUNDANCE OF STRIPED BASS OR ROCKFISH IN AREAS
THROUGHOUT THE CHESAPEAKE BAY AND ITS TIDAL TRIBUTARIES.
(B) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) CONDUCT THE ANNUAL YOUNG–OF–THE–YEAR JUVENILE SURVEY
OF STRIPED BASS OR ROCKFISH AT BETWEEN 12 AND 20, INCLUSIVE, SAMPLING
SITES LOCATED IN THE CENTRAL REGION OF THE MARYLAND WATERS OF THE
CHESAPEAKE BAY IN ADDITION TO SAMPLING SITES IN THE NORTHERN AND
SOUTHERN REGIONS OF THE CHESAPEAKE BAY; AND
(2) LOCATE THE CENTRAL REGION SAMPLING SITES IN ANY OF THE
FOLLOWING WATERS OF THE STATE:
(1) CONDUCT SAMPLING USING THE SAME OR EQUIVALENT METHODS
AS THE YOUNG–OF–THE–YEAR JUVENILE INDEX SURVEY OF STRIPED BASS OR
ROCKFISH IN AT LEAST TWO SITES LOCATED IN THE CENTRAL REGION OF THE
MARYLAND WATERS OF THE CHESAPEAKE BAY AND ITS TIDAL TRIBUTARIES; AND
(2) LOCATE THE CENTRAL REGION SAMPLING SITES IN AREAS OTHER
THAN THE AREAS SAMPLED FOR THE YOUNG–OF–THE–YEAR JUVENILE INDEX
SURVEY OF STRIPED BASS OR ROCKFISH AND IN ANY OF THE FOLLOWING WATERS
OF THE STATE:

HOUSE BILL 889 3
(I) THE MAGOTHY RIVER;
(II) THE SEVERN RIVER;
(III) THE CHESTER RIVER;
(IV) THE SOUTH RIVER;
(V) THE WEST RIVER;
(VI) EASTERN BAY; OR
(VII) THE MILES RIVER.;
(VIII) THE PATAPSCO RIVER;
(IX) THE RHODE RIVER; OR
(X) THE TRED AVON RIVER.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
4–746.
IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 4–215 OF THIS TITLE, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL
CONDUCT SCIENTIFIC MONITORING TO COLLECT BIOLOGICAL INFORMATION TO
DETERMINE THE RELATIVE ABUNDANCE OF STRIPED BASS OR ROCKFISH IN AREAS
THROUGHOUT THE CHESAPEAKE BAY AND ITS TIDAL TRIBUTARIES.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Department of Natural
Resources shall annually examine the survey data collected under § 4–746(b) of the Natural
Resources Article, as enacted under Section 2 of this Act, to ensure the distribution of
striped bass or rockfish has not shifted from the established sites of the young–of–the–year
juvenile index survey of striped bass or rockfish.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 31
each year, the Department of Natural Resources shall report its results from its
examination of the survey data conducted under Section 4 of this Act to the Sport Fisheries
Advisory Commission, the Tidal Fisheries Advisory Commission, and, in accordance with §
2–1257 of the State Government Article, the Senate Committee on Education, Energy, and
the Environment and the House Environment and Transportation Committee.

HOUSE BILL 889
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 3 of this Act shall take
effect July 1, 2027.
SECTION 2. 7. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, except as provided in
Section 6 of this Act, this Act shall take effect June 1, 2025. Sections 2, 4, and 5 of this Act
shall remain effective for a period of 2 years and 1 month and, at the end of June 30, 2027,
Sections 2, 4, and 5 of this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly,
shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.